California statutes. Public Resources Code
(1) “Disadvantaged community” means an area identified by the California Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code or an area that is a disadvantaged unincorporated community pursuant to Section 65302.10 of the Government Code.

(2) “Environmental leadership media campus project” or “project” means a construction or renovation project on a film and television media campus in the County of Los Angeles.

(b) A city within the County of Los Angeles that is the lead agency for the project
 shall certify an environmental leadership media campus project for streamlining pursuant to this section if the lead agency finds that all of the following conditions will be met:

(1) The project will result in an investment of at least one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) in California upon completion of the construction.

(2) (A) The project will obtain certification as Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) gold standard or better from the United States Green Building Council for all new construction that is eligible for LEED certification.

(B) Any new construction or major renovation of existing buildings that is not eligible for LEED certification will achieve comparable standards for energy and water efficiency, including, but not limited to, meeting Tier 1 energy efficiency
 standards.

(3) The project will achieve a reduction in vehicle miles traveled per capita of at least 15 percent compared to existing development consistent with the Office of Planning and Research’s technical advisory on evaluating transportation impacts in CEQA and at least 50 percent of any greenhouse gas emissions reductions necessary to achieve zero net additional greenhouse gas emissions as required by paragraph (4) will be from onsite and local reduction measures.

(4) The project does not result in any net additional greenhouse gas emissions, including, but not limited to, from employee transportation. A project is deemed to meet the requirements of this paragraph if the project applicant demonstrates to the lead agency that the project applicant has a binding commitment that it will mitigate impacts resulting from the greenhouse gas emissions, if any, in accordance with
 Section 21183.6.

(5) If measures are required to mitigate significant environmental impacts in a disadvantaged community, those impacts will be mitigated consistent with this division, including Section 21002, and the mitigation measures required under this subdivision will be undertaken in, and directly benefit, the affected community.

(6) The project will generate at least 1,000 jobs during construction.

(7) (A) (i) The project creates high-wage, highly skilled jobs that pay prevailing wages and living wages, employs a skilled and trained workforce, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 2601 of the Public Contract Code, provides construction jobs and permanent jobs for Californians, and helps reduce unemployment. For purposes of this subdivision, “jobs that pay
 prevailing wages” means that all construction workers employed in the execution of the project will receive at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code. If the project is certified for streamlining, the project applicant shall include this requirement in all contracts for the performance of the work.

(ii) Clause (i) does not apply to a contractor or subcontractor performing the work on the project that is subject to a project labor agreement requiring the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the project and providing for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this clause, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public
 Contract Code.

(B) (i) If the project is certified pursuant to this subdivision, contractors and subcontractors shall pay to all construction workers employed in the execution of the project at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages.

(ii) Except as provided in clause (iii), the obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the project, or by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action. If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the
 payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(iii) Clause (ii) does not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the project and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this subparagraph, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(8) The project applicant demonstrates compliance with the requirements of Chapters 12.8 (commencing with Section 42649) and 12.9 (commencing with Section 42649.8) of Part 3 of Division 30, as applicable.

(9) The project applicant agrees that all mitigation measures required pursuant to this division and any other environmental measures required by this section to certify the project under this section shall be conditions of approval of the project, and those conditions will be fully enforceable by the lead agency or another agency designated by the lead agency. In the case of environmental mitigation measures and any other environmental measures required by this section, the project applicant agrees, as an ongoing obligation, that those measures will be monitored and enforced by the lead agency for the life of the obligation. The project applicant shall submit to the lead agency an annual status report on the implementation of the environmental mitigation measures and any other environmental measures required by this section.

(10) The project applicant agrees to pay any additional costs
 incurred by the courts in hearing and deciding any case subject to this section, including payment of the costs for the appointment of a special master if deemed appropriate by the court, in a form and manner specified by the Judicial Council, as provided in the California Rules of Court adopted by the Judicial Council.

(11) The project applicant agrees to pay the costs of preparing the record of proceedings for the project concurrent with review and consideration of the project pursuant to this division, in a form and manner specified by the lead agency for the project.

(c) On or before July 1, 2025, the Judicial Council shall adopt rules of court that apply to any action or proceeding brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the certification of an environmental impact report for an environmental leadership media campus project or the granting of any project approval
 that requires the action or proceeding, including any potential appeals to the court of appeal or the Supreme Court, to be resolved, to the extent feasible, within 365 calendar days of the filing of the certified record of proceedings with the court.

(d) (1) The draft and final environmental impact report for an environmental leadership media campus project shall include a notice in not less than 12-point type stating the following:

THIS ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT REPORT IS SUBJECT TO SECTION 21168.6.6 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE, WHICH PROVIDES, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THAT THE LEAD AGENCY NEED NOT CONSIDER CERTAIN COMMENTS FILED AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE PUBLIC COMMENT PERIOD, IF ANY, FOR THE DRAFT ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT REPORT. ANY JUDICIAL ACTION
 CHALLENGING THE CERTIFICATION OR ADOPTION OF THE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT REPORT OR THE APPROVAL OF THE PROJECT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 21168.6.6 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE IS SUBJECT TO THE PROCEDURES SET FORTH IN THAT SECTION. A COPY OF SECTION 21168.6.6 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE IS INCLUDED IN THE APPENDIX TO THIS ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT REPORT.

(2) The draft environmental impact report and final environmental impact report shall contain, as an appendix, the full text of this section.

(3) Within 10 calendar days after the release of the draft environmental impact report, the lead agency shall conduct an informational workshop to inform the public of the key analyses and conclusions of that document, as applicable.

(4) Within 10 calendar days before the close of the public comment period, the lead agency shall hold a public hearing to receive testimony on the draft environmental impact report. A transcript of the hearing shall be included as an appendix to the final environmental impact report, as applicable.

(5) (A) Within five calendar days following the close of the public comment period, a commenter on the draft environmental impact report may submit to the lead agency a written request for nonbinding mediation, as applicable. The lead agency shall participate in nonbinding mediation with all commenters who submitted timely comments on the draft environmental impact report and who requested the mediation. Mediation conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall end no later than 35 calendar days after the
 close of the public comment period.

(B) A request for mediation shall identify all areas of dispute raised in the comment submitted by the commenter that are to be mediated.

(C) The lead agency shall select one or more mediators who shall be retired judges or recognized experts with at least five years’ experience in land use and environmental law or science, or mediation. The lead agency shall bear the costs of mediation.

(D) A mediation session shall be conducted on each area of dispute with the parties requesting mediation on that area of dispute.

(E) The lead agency shall adopt, as a condition of approval, any measures agreed upon by the lead agency and any commenter who requested mediation. A commenter who agrees to a measure pursuant to this subparagraph shall not raise the issue addressed by that measure as a basis for an action or proceeding challenging the lead agency’s decision to certify the environmental impact report or to grant project approval.

(6) The lead agency need not consider written comments on the draft environmental impact report submitted after the close of the public comment period, unless those comments address any of the following:

(A) New issues raised in the response to comments by the lead agency.

(B) New information released by the lead agency subsequent to the release of the draft environmental impact report, such as new information set forth or embodied in a staff report, proposed permit, proposed resolution, ordinance, or similar documents.

(C) Changes made to the project after the close of the public comment period.

(D) Proposed conditions for approval, mitigation measures, or proposed findings required by Section 21081 or a proposed reporting or monitoring program required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 21081.6, if the lead agency releases those documents subsequent to the release of the draft environmental impact report.

(E) New information that was not reasonably known and could not have been reasonably known during the public comment period.

(7) The lead agency shall file the notice required by subdivision (a) of Section 21152 within five calendar days after the last initial project approval.

(e) (1) The lead agency shall prepare and certify the record of proceedings in accordance with this subdivision and in accordance with Rule 3.2205 of the California Rules of Court.

(2) No later than three business days following the date of the release of the
 draft environmental impact report, the lead agency shall make available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format the draft environmental impact report and all other documents relied on by the lead agency in the preparation of the draft environmental impact report. A document prepared by the lead agency after the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report that is a part of the record of proceedings shall be made available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five business days after the document is prepared by the lead agency.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), documents relied on by the lead agency that were not prepared specifically for the project and are copyright protected are not required to be made readily accessible in an electronic format. For those copyright protected documents, the lead agency shall make an
 index of the documents available in an electronic format no later than the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report, or within five business days if the document is received or relied on by the lead agency after the release of the draft environmental impact report. The index shall specify the libraries or lead agency offices in which hardcopies of the copyrighted materials are available for public review.

(4) The lead agency shall encourage written comments on the project to be submitted in a readily accessible electronic format, and shall make any such comments available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five calendar days of their receipt.

(5) Within seven business days after the receipt of any
 comment that is not in an electronic format, the lead agency shall convert that comment into a readily accessible electronic format and make it available to the public in that format.

(6) The lead agency shall indicate in the record of proceedings comments received that were not considered by the lead agency and need not include the content of the comments as a part of the record of proceedings.

(7) Within five calendar days after the filing of the notice required by subdivision (a) of Section 21152, the lead agency shall certify the record of proceedings for the approval or determination and shall provide an electronic copy of the record of proceedings to a party that has submitted a written request for a copy. The lead agency may charge and
 collect a reasonable fee from a party requesting a copy of the record of proceedings for the electronic copy, which shall not exceed the reasonable cost of reproducing that copy.

(8) Within 10 calendar days after being served with a complaint or a petition for a writ of mandate, the lead agency shall lodge a copy of the certified record of proceedings with the superior court.

(9) Any dispute over the content of the record of proceedings shall be resolved by the superior court. Unless the superior court directs otherwise, a party disputing the content of the record of proceedings shall file a motion to augment the record of proceedings at the time it files its initial brief.

(10) The contents of the record of proceedings shall be as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 21167.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 255, Sec. 2.   (AB 3265)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21168.6.7.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Applicant” means a public or private entity or its affiliates that proposes the project and its successors, heirs, and assignees.

(2) “City of Oakland’s Bird Safety Measures” means bird safe ordinance guidelines added in June 2013 by City of Oakland’s planning staff to the city’s standard building permit requirements to reduce bird collisions and other negative impacts to wildlife. 

(3) “Oakland Sports and Mixed-Use Project” or “project” means the following components of a sports center and mixed-use project located at the Howard Terminal site in the City of Oakland, from demolition and site preparation through operation:

(A) A baseball park that will become the new home to the Oakland Athletics and adjacent residential, retail, commercial, cultural, entertainment, or recreational uses developed by the Oakland Athletics, and that meets all of the following:

(i) The baseball park
 receives Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) Gold certification for new construction within one year after completion of the first baseball season and each new nonresidential building receives LEED Gold certification for new construction within one year after completion of the applicable nonresidential building. Any residential building shall achieve sustainability standards of at least a LEED Gold level or the comparable GreenPoint rating, including meeting sustainability standards for access to quality transit.

(ii) The
 project does not result in any net additional
 emissions of greenhouse gases, including greenhouse gas emissions from employee transportation, as determined by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code. To maximize public health, environmental, and employment benefits, the lead agency shall require measures that will reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases in the project area and in the neighboring communities of the baseball park. Not less than 50 percent of the greenhouse gas emissions reductions necessary to achieve the requirements of this clause, excluding the greenhouse gas emissions from residential
 uses of the project, shall be from local, direct greenhouse gas emissions reduction measures that give consideration to criteria air pollutant and toxic air contaminant emissions reductions, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(I) Project design features or onsite reduction measures, or both design features and onsite reduction measures.

(II) Off-site reduction measures in the neighboring communities.

The applicant may obtain offset credits for up to 50 percent of the greenhouse gas emissions reductions necessary to achieve the requirement of this clause. The applicant shall, to the extent feasible, place the highest priority on the purchase of offset credits that produce emission reductions within the City of
 Oakland or the boundaries of the Bay Area Air Quality Management District. Any offset credits shall be verified by a third party accredited by the State Air Resources Board. In no event shall offset credits be used from a project located outside the United States.

(iii)   The project has a transportation management plan or transportation demand management program, or both, that achieves a 20-percent reduction in the number of vehicle trips collectively by attendees, employees, visitors, and customers as compared to operations absent the transportation management plan or transportation demand management program, or both that plan and program. The plan or program for the baseball park shall achieve the 20-percent reduction within one-year after the completion of the first baseball season. The plan or program for the nonbaseball-park
 portion of the project shall achieve the 20-percent reduction within one year after the completion of that portion. The transportation management plan or transportation demand program shall include a menu of options designed to reduce the number of vehicle trips, including temporarily expanding the capacity of a public transit line, as appropriate, to serve the baseball park events, and participation in a transportation management association that will determine a range of services and programs designed to meet the 20-percent reduction, including providing incentives for transit usage and carpools, bicycle parking and support, signage, and real-time transit information. 

(iv) The project is located within a priority development area identified in the sustainable communities strategy Plan Bay Area 2040 adopted by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission and the
 Association of Bay Area Governments.

(v) The project is subject to a comprehensive package of community benefits approved by the Port of Oakland or City Council of the City of Oakland, as applicable, which may include local employment and job training programs, local business and small business policies, public access and open space, affordable housing, transportation infrastructure, increased frequency of public transit, and transit accessibility and sustainable and healthy development measures for the surrounding community. 

(B) Associated public spaces.

(C) Facilities and infrastructure for ingress, egress, and use of the baseball park and mixed-use development.

(b) As a condition of approval of the project, the lead agency shall require the applicant, with respect to any measures specific to the operation of the baseball park, to implement measures that will meet the requirements of this division by the end of the first baseball season.

(c) Rules 3.2220 to 3.2237, inclusive, of the California Rules of Court, as may be amended by the Judicial Council, shall apply to any action or proceeding brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the
 certification or adoption of any environmental
 impact report for the project that is certified pursuant to subdivision (d) or the granting of any project approvals, to require the action or proceeding, including any potential appeals therefrom, to be resolved, to the extent feasible, within 270 days of the filing of the certified record of proceedings with the court. On or before
 September 1, 2019, the Judicial Council shall amend the California Rules of Court, as necessary, to implement this subdivision.

(d) The Governor may certify the project for streamlining pursuant to this section if it complies with all of the following conditions:

(1) The project creates high-wage, highly skilled jobs that pay prevailing wages and living wages, provides construction jobs and permanent jobs for Californians, and helps reduce unemployment. For purposes of
 this subdivision, “jobs that pay prevailing wages” means that all construction workers employed in the execution of the project will receive at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code. If the project is certified for streamlining, the project applicant shall include this requirement in all contracts for the performance of the work.

(2) (A) If the project is certified pursuant to this section, contractors and subcontractors shall pay to all construction workers employed in the execution of the project at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages.

(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (C), the
 obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages pursuant
 to subparagraph (A) may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code within 18 months after the completion of the project, or by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action. If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(C) Subparagraph (B) does not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all
 construction workers employed in the execution of the project and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this subparagraph, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(3) The project applicant demonstrates compliance with clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and mitigation measures, to the extent feasible, to reduce any additional greenhouse gas emissions from the project, including greenhouse gas emissions from employee transportation.

(4) The project applicant demonstrates compliance with the requirements of Chapter 12.8 (commencing with Section 42649) and Chapter 12.9 (commencing with Section 42649.8) of Part 3 of Division 30, as applicable.

(5) The project applicant has entered into a binding and enforceable agreement that all mitigation measures required pursuant to this division and any other environmental measures required by this section to certify the project under this chapter shall be conditions of approval of the project, and those conditions will be fully enforceable by the lead agency or another agency designated by the lead agency. In the case of environmental mitigation
 measures and any other environmental measures required by this section, the applicant agrees, as an ongoing obligation, that those measures will be monitored and enforced by the lead agency for the life of the obligation.

(6) The project applicant agrees to pay for any additional costs incurred by the courts in hearing and deciding any case brought pursuant to this section, including payment of the costs for the appointment of a special master if deemed appropriate by the court, in a form and manner specified by the Judicial Council, as provided in the rules of court adopted by the Judicial Council.

(7) The project applicant agrees to pay the costs of preparing
 the record of proceedings for the project concurrent with review and consideration of the project pursuant to this division, in a form and manner specified by the lead agency for the project.

(8) Project design and implementation will comply with the City of Oakland’s Bird Safety Measures, adopted in 2013. Nighttime programming will apply best management practice strategies to avoid and reduce potential collision hazards for migratory and resident birds, to the extent feasible.

(9) The project meets the requirements of clauses (iv) and (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(e) (1) Prior to certifying the project, the Governor shall make a determination that each of the conditions specified in subdivision (d) has been met. These findings are not subject to judicial review.

(2) The guidelines issued pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 21178) apply to the implementation of this section, to the extent those
 guidelines are applicable and do not conflict with specific requirements of this section.

(f) (1) The draft and final environmental
 impact report shall include a notice in not less than 12-point type stating the following:
THIS ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT REPORT IS SUBJECT TO SECTION 21168.6.7 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE, WHICH PROVIDES, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THAT THE LEAD AGENCY NEED NOT CONSIDER CERTAIN COMMENTS FILED AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE PUBLIC COMMENT PERIOD, IF ANY, FOR THE DRAFT ENVIRONMENTAL
 IMPACT REPORT. ANY JUDICIAL ACTION CHALLENGING THE CERTIFICATION OR ADOPTION OF THE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT REPORT OR THE APPROVAL OF THE PROJECT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 21168.6.7 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE IS SUBJECT TO THE PROCEDURES SET FORTH IN THAT SECTION. A COPY OF SECTION 21168.6.7 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE IS INCLUDED IN THE APPENDIX TO THIS ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT REPORT.
(2) The draft environmental impact report and final environmental impact report shall contain, as an appendix, the full text of this section.

(3) Within 10 days after the release of the draft environmental impact report, the lead agency shall conduct an informational workshop to
 inform the public of the key analyses and conclusions of that document.

(4) Within 10 days before the close of the public comment period, the lead agency shall hold a public hearing to receive testimony on the draft environmental impact report. A transcript of the hearing shall be included as an appendix to the final environmental impact report.

(5) (A) Within five days following the close of
 the public comment period, a commenter on the draft environmental impact report may submit to the lead agency a written request for nonbinding mediation. The lead agency and applicant shall participate in nonbinding mediation with all commenters who submitted timely comments on the draft environmental impact report and who requested the mediation. Mediation conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall end no later than 35 days after the close of the public comment period.

(B) A request for mediation shall identify all areas of dispute raised in the comment submitted by the commenter that are to be mediated.

(C) The lead agency shall select one or more mediators who shall be retired judges or recognized experts with at least five years’ experience in land use and environmental law or science, or mediation. The applicant shall bear the costs of mediation.

(D) A mediation session shall be conducted on each area of dispute with the parties requesting mediation on that area of dispute.

(E) The lead agency shall adopt, as a condition of approval, any measures agreed upon by the lead agency, the applicant, and any commenter who requested mediation. A commenter who agrees to a
 measure pursuant to this subparagraph shall not raise the issue addressed by that measure as a basis for an action or proceeding challenging the lead agency’s decision to certify or to adopt the environmental
 impact report or to grant project approval.

(6) The lead agency need not consider written comments submitted after the close of the public comment period, unless those comments address any of the following:

(A) New issues raised in the response to comments by the lead agency.

(B) New information released by the public agency subsequent to the release of the draft environmental impact report, such as new information set forth or embodied in a staff report, proposed permit, proposed resolution,
 ordinance, or similar documents.

(C) Changes made to the project after the close of the public comment period.

(D) Proposed conditions for approval, mitigation measures, or
 proposed findings required by Section 21081 or a proposed reporting and monitoring program required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 21081.6, if the lead agency releases those documents subsequent to the release of the draft environmental impact report.

(E) New information that was not reasonably known and could not have been reasonably known during the public comment period.

(7) The lead agency shall file the notice required by subdivision (a) of Section 21152 within five days after the last initial project approval.

(g) (1) The lead agency shall prepare and certify the record of the proceedings in accordance with this subdivision and in accordance with Rule 3.1365 of the California Rules of Court. The applicant shall pay the lead agency for all costs of preparing and certifying the record of proceedings.

(2) No later than three business days following the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report, the lead agency shall make available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format the draft environmental
 impact report and all other documents submitted to or relied on by the lead agency in the preparation of the draft environmental impact report. A document prepared by the lead agency or submitted by the applicant after the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report
 that is a part of the record of the proceedings shall be made available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five business days after the document is prepared or received by the lead agency.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), documents submitted to or relied on by the lead agency that were not prepared specifically for the project and are copyright protected are not required to be made readily accessible in an electronic format. For those copyright protected documents, the lead agency shall make an index of the documents available in an electronic format no later than the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report,
 or within five business days if the document is received or relied on by the lead agency after the release of the draft environmental impact report. The index shall specify the libraries or lead agency offices in which hardcopies of the copyrighted materials are available for public review.

(4) The lead agency shall encourage written comments on the project to be submitted in a readily accessible electronic format, and shall make any such comments available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five days of their receipt.

(5) Within seven business
 days after the receipt of any comment that is not in an electronic format, the lead agency shall convert that comment into a readily accessible electronic format and make it available to the public in that format.

(6) The lead agency shall indicate in the record of the proceedings comments received that were not considered by the lead agency pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (f) and need not include the content of the comments as a part of the record.

(7) Within five days after the filing of the notice required by subdivision (a) of Section 21152, the lead agency shall certify the record of the
 proceedings for the approval or determination and shall provide an electronic copy of the record to a party that has submitted a written request for a copy. The lead agency may charge and collect a reasonable fee from a party requesting a copy of the record for the electronic copy, which shall not exceed the reasonable cost of reproducing that copy.

(8) Within 10 days after being served with a complaint or a petition for a writ of mandate, the lead agency shall lodge a copy of the certified record of proceedings with the superior court.

(9) Any dispute over the content of the record of the proceedings shall be resolved by the superior court. Unless the superior court directs otherwise, a party disputing the content of the record shall file a motion to augment the record at the
 time it files its initial brief.

(10) The contents of the record of proceedings shall be as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 21167.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 959, Sec. 2.   (AB 734)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21168.6.8.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Applicant” means a private or public entity or its affiliates that proposes to implement and operate all or any portion of the project and its successors, heirs, and assignees.

(2) “Arena” means an 18,000 to 20,000 seat arena built as part of the project for National Basketball Association (NBA) basketball games and other spectator events.

(3) “Project” means a project located within the project area consisting of the arena plus practice and athletic training facility, and
 related parking and access, infrastructure construction or relocation, and landscaping, up to approximately 75,000 square feet of associated office space, up to approximately 30,000 square feet of sports medicine clinic space, up to approximately 70,000 square feet of ancillary retail, restaurant, community space, and similar uses, and a hotel, provided that the project meets all of the following:

(A) Receives Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) gold certification for new construction within one year of the completion of the first NBA season.

(B) (i) Requires a transportation demand management program that, upon full implementation, will achieve and maintain a 15-percent reduction in the number of vehicle
 trips, collectively, by attendees, employees, visitors, and customers as compared to operations absent the
 transportation demand management program.

(ii) To accelerate and maximize vehicle trip reduction, each measure in the transportation demand management program shall be implemented as soon as feasible, so that no less than a 7.5-percent reduction in vehicle trips is achieved and maintained by the end of the first NBA season during which an NBA team has played at the arena.

(iii) A 15-percent reduction in vehicle trips shall be achieved and maintained as soon as feasible, but not later than January 1, 2030. The applicant shall verify achievement to the lead agency and the Office of Planning and Research.

(iv) If the applicant fails to verify achievement of the reduction required by clause (iii), the lead agency shall impose additional
 feasible measures to reduce vehicle trips by 17 percent, or, if there is a rail transit line with a stop within one-quarter mile of the arena, 20 percent, by January 1, 2035.

(C) Is located on an infill site.

(D) Is consistent with the general use designation, density, building intensity, and applicable policies specified for the project area in either a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy for which the State Air Resources Board, pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code, has accepted a metropolitan planning organization’s determination that the sustainable communities strategy or the alternative planning strategy would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission
 reduction targets.

(4) “Project approval” means any action, activity, ordinance, resolution, agreement, approval, determination, finding, or decision taken, adopted, or approved by the lead agency required to allow the applicant to commence the construction of the project, as determined by the lead agency.

(5) “Project area” means real property in the City of Inglewood consisting of approximately 35 acres, including without limitation areas generally described as follows:

(A) Assessor identification numbers 4032-001-005, 4032-001-006, 4032-001-033, 4032-001-035, 4032-001-039, 4032-001-048, 4032-001-049, 4032-001-900 to 4032-001-913, inclusive, 4032-002-913 to 4032-002-917, inclusive, 4032-003-912, 4032-003-914,
 4032-003-915, 4032-004-913, 4032-004-914, 4032-007-035, 4032-007-900 to 4032-007-905, inclusive, 4032-008-001, 4032-008-002, 4032-008-006, 4032-008-034, 4032-008-035, 4032-008-900 to 4032-008-905, inclusive, 4032-008-907, 4032-008-908, 4034-004-026, 4034-004-900 to 4034-004-913, inclusive, and 4034-005-900 to 4034-005-912, inclusive.

(B) West 101st Street from its intersection with South Prairie Avenue westerly to a line approximately 488 feet west of the western boundary of South Prairie Avenue, and West 102nd Street from its intersection with South Prairie Avenue easterly to a line approximately 883 feet east of the eastern boundary of South Prairie Avenue.

(C) Adjacent areas or air space to be used for access.

(6) “Transportation demand management program” means a specific program of strategies, incentives, and tools to be implemented, with specific annual status reporting obligations in accordance with paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), to reduce vehicle trips by providing opportunities for event attendees and employees to choose sustainable travel options such as transit, bicycle riding, or walking. A specific program of strategies, incentives, and tools includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) Provision of shuttles, charter buses, or similar services from a major transit stop to serve arena events.

(B) Provision of onsite electric vehicle charging stations in excess of applicable requirements.
